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DIAGNOSTICS - AUTOMATIC TRANSMISSION (A442F)

DI2LE-02

DTC P 1760/77|Linear Solenoid for Line Pressure Control
Circuit Malfunction (SLT Solenoid Valve)

Line Pressure Con-
trol Pressure

i
CurrentFlowto Solenoid  pozss

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The throttle pressure that is applied to the primary regulator
valve (which modulates line pressure) causes the SLT solenoid
valve, under electronic control, to precisely and minutely modu-
lates and generates line pressure according to the accelerator
pedal effort, or engine power output detected.

This reduces the function of line pressure and provides smooth
shifting characteristics.

Uponreceiving thethrottle valve opening angle signal, Engine
andECTECU (2UZ -FE)orECTECU (1HD -FTE)controlsthe
line pressure by sending a predetermined (*) duty ratio to the
solenoid valve, modulating the line pressure, generating

ON A throttle pressure.
(*) Duty Ratio

B The duty ratio is the ratio of the period of continuity in one cycle.

OFF e For example, if A is the period of continuity in one cycle, and B
1 cycle . . oo
—_— - istheperiodofnon  —continuity, then
BE4056 i /\
Duty Ratio = —A+B X 100 (%)

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P1760/77 (@) SLT _terminal: 0V
(b) SLT terminal: 12V

(a) or (b) condition below is detected for 1 second or more.

¢ Openorshortin SLT solenoid valve circuit
*SLTsolenoidvalve
*EngineandECTECU (2UZ -FE)
*ECTECU(1HD -FTE)
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Reference
Refertothe chartforthe wave formbetweenterminals SLT
andSLT duringengineidling.
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check SLT solenoid valve.

PREPARATION:

P~ @1 (@) Jack up the vehicle.
@) (b) Remove the oil pan.
A4 L (c) Disconnect the solenoid connector.

Check solenoid resistance:
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of solenoid con-

g nector.

OK:
777 A AT, Resistance: 5.0 - 5.6 Q at 20 °C (68°F)
L',I;E;.!,/ Check solenoid operation:
i —— CHECK:

Connect positive (+) lead with an 8 ~ 10 W bulb to terminal 1 of
solenoid connector and negative (-) lead to terminal 2, then
check the movement of the valve.

OK:
Whenbatt it tagei lied Valve movesin« direction
Do1888 ﬁv\\ enbatiery positivevoltageisappiied. intheillustrationontheleft.
D01889
D01887 ~ D02235 Valvemovesin @l * direction

When batter itive volt i t off.
enbattery positive voltage is cut o intheillustrationontheleft.

NG> Replace SLT solenoid valve.

@

2 | Check harness and connector between SLT solenoid valve and Engine and ECT
ECU or ECT ECU(See page IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

Check and replace Engine and ECT ECU or
ECT ECU (See page IN-35).
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